Washington statutes.
RCW 36.39.060

Senior citizens programs—Long-term care ombuds programs—Authorization.

(1) Counties, cities, and towns are granted the authority, and it is hereby declared to be a public purpose for counties, cities, and towns, to establish and administer senior citizens programs either directly or by creating public corporations or authorities to carry out the programs and to expend their own funds for such purposes, as well as to expend federal, state, or private funds that are made available for such purposes. Such federal funds shall include, but not be limited to, funds provided under the federal older Americans act, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.).

(2) Counties, cities, and towns may establish and administer long-term care ombuds programs for residents, patients, and clients if such a program is not prohibited by federal or state law. Such local ombuds programs shall be coordinated with the efforts of other long-term care ombuds programs, including the office of the state long-term care ombuds established in RCW 43.190.030, to avoid multiple investigation of complaints.

[ 2013 c 23 s 67; 1983 c 290 s 13; 1979 c 109 s 1.]